Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1372.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section SECTIONS to read:Section 912. Annual Report 217. ANNUAL REPORT OF CHILDREN FACILITIES AND PAYMENTS .-- (a) The department shall prepare an annual report summarizing the department's inspection, investigation and enforcement activities relating to child care centers, group child care homes, family child care homes and child residential and day treatment facilities regulated by the <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 department under this article ARTICLE IX OR X . (b) At a minimum, the report shall include all of the following:(1) The number of inspections conducted under 55 Pa. Code Chs. 3270 (relating to child care centers), 3280 (relating to group child care homes), 3290 (relating to family child care homes) and 3800 (relating to child residential and day treatment facilities).(2) The number and types of violations identified.(1) THE NUMBER OF INSPECTIONS OF THE FACILITIES IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A) CONDUCTED DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.(2) A COPY OF EACH AGGREGATE STATE IMPROPER PAYMENTS REPORT AND STATE IMPROPER PAYMENTS CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER 45 CFR PT. 98 SUBPT. K (RELATING TO ERROR RATE REPORTING).(3) The number and types of enforcement actions taken, including enforcement actions taken against a facility operating without a license required by this act OR APPROVAL , operating after refusal, nonrenewal or revocation of the facility's license OR APPROVAL, or operating in violation of an injunction or other process restraining or prohibiting operation. The information under this clause shall be disaggregated by Statewide and by region as administered by the department for licensure and inspection. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISAGGREGATE THE INFORMATION UNDER THIS CLAUSE BY EACH REGION AND SHALL INCLUDE STATEWIDE TOTALS.(4) The number of complaints received and investigations initiated FOR THE FACILITIES IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A) . (5) A summary of taxpayer-funded child care payments made under 55 Pa. Code Ch. 168 (relating to child care) and, to the 20260SB1372PN1865 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extent information is available to the department, verification activities, improper payments identified and amounts recouped.(5) A SUMMARY OF ANNUAL SUBSIDIZED CHILD CARE PAYMENTS ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND, TO THE EXTENT INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT, AGGREGATE VERIFICATION ACTIVITIES, IMPROPER PAYMENTS IDENTIFIED AND AMOUNTS RECOUPED.(c) The report shall COVER THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR AND , to the extent applicable, separately identify annual inspections, complaint investigations UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(4) and other monitoring or partial inspections.(d) The department shall post the report on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department and shall submit the report on or before January 1 of each year to all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Aging and Older Adult Services CHILDREN AND YOUTH Committee of the House of Representatives. SECTION 709.5. CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM STANDARDS IN CHILD CARE FACILITIES.-- (A) EACH BUILDING IN WHICH A CHILD CARE FACILITY IS IN OPERATION , WHICH USES A FOSSIL-FUEL-BURNING HEATER OR APPLIANCE, FIREPLACE OR AN ATTACHED GARAGE, MUST HAVE AN OPERATIONAL, CENTRALLY LOCATED AND APPROVED CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM INSTALLED IN THE VICINITY OF THE FOSSIL-FUEL-BURNING HEATER OR FIREPLACE AND IN EVERY UNIT THAT IS LOCATED ON THE 20260SB1372PN1865 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SAME STORY AS THE FOSSIL-FUEL-BURNING HEATER OR APPLIANCE WITHIN EIGHTEEN MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C), THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE OR RENEW A LICENSE FOR A CHILD CARE FACILITY SUPERVISED OR LICENSED UNDER ARTICLE IX OR X IF THE CHILD CARE FACILITY FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(C) IF A CHILD CARE FACILITY LICENSED UNDER ARTICLE X IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A), THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE A PROVISIONAL LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 1008.(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION IS INTENDED TO MODIFY THE AUTHORITY AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1999 (P.L.491, NO.45), KNOWN AS THE "PENNSYLVANIA CONSTRUCTION CODE ACT."(E) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"APPROVED CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM" INCLUDES:(1) A SINGLE OR MULTIPLE STATION CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM LISTED AS COMPLYING WITH THE STANDARD FOR SINGLE AND MULTIPLE STATION CARBON MONOXIDE ALARMS (ANSI/UL2034) OR A CARBON MONOXIDE DETECTOR LISTED AS COMPLYING WITH THE STANDARD FOR GAS AND VAPOR DETECTORS AND SENSORS (ANSI/UL2075) INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(2) A DEVICE THAT MAY BE COMBINED WITH A SMOKE ALARM OR SMOKE DETECTOR IF THE COMBINED SMOKE ALARM OR SMOKE DETECTOR MEETS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) COMPLIES WITH EITHER OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) THE STANDARD FOR SINGLE AND MULTIPLE STATION CARBON MONOXIDE ALARMS (ANSI/UL2034) FOR CARBON MONOXIDE ALARMS AND THE 20260SB1372PN1865 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STANDARD FOR SINGLE AND MULTIPLE STATION SMOKE ALARMS (ANSI/UL217) FOR SMOKE ALARMS.(B) THE STANDARD FOR GAS AND VAPOR DETECTORS AND SENSORS (ANSI/UL2075) FOR CARBON MONOXIDE DETECTORS AND THE STANDARD FOR SAFETY FOR SMOKE DETECTORS FOR FIRE ALARM SYSTEMS (ANSI/UL268) FOR SMOKE DETECTORS.(II) EMITS AN ALARM IN A MANNER THAT CLEARLY DIFFERENTIATES BETWEEN DETECTING THE PRESENCE OF CARBON MONOXIDE AND THE PRESENCE OF SMOKE.(3) A CARBON MONOXIDE DETECTION SYSTEM THAT INCLUDES CARBON MONOXIDE DETECTORS AND AUDIBLE NOTIFICATION APPLIANCES THAT ARE INSTALLED AND MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE NATIONAL FIRE ALARM AND SIGNALING CODE (NFPA 72) AND THE STANDARD FOR THE INSTALLATION OF CARBON MONOXIDE (CO) DETECTION AND WARNING EQUIPMENT (NFPA 720) AND ARE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE STANDARD FOR GAS AND VAPOR DETECTORS AND SENSORS (ANSI/UL2075)."CHILD CARE" MEANS CARE IN LIEU OF PARENTAL CARE GIVEN FOR PART OF THE DAY TO A CHILD UNDER SIXTEEN YEARS OF AGE AWAY FROM THEIR OWN HOME. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE CHILD CARE FURNISHED IN PLACES OF WORSHIP DURING RELIGIOUS SERVICES."CHILD CARE FACILITY" MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A PREMISES IN WHICH CHILD CARE IS PROVIDED FOR A PERIOD EXCEEDING TWENTY-FOUR HOURS FOR A CHILD UNDER SIXTEEN YEARS OF AGE WHO IS NOT A RELATIVE OF THE OPERATOR AND WHO IS NOT ACCOMPANIED BY A PARENT, INDIVIDUAL STANDING IN LOCO PARENTIS OR LEGAL GUARDIAN. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS CLAUSE, THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PREMISES SELECTED FOR CARE OF A CHILD BY A PARENT, INDIVIDUAL STANDING IN LOCO PARENTIS OR LEGAL GUARDIAN FOR A PERIOD OF THIRTY DAYS OR LESS OR A FACILITY OPERATED UNDER SOCIAL SERVICE AUSPICES.20260SB1372PN1865 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A PREMISES IN WHICH CHILD CARE IS PROVIDED SIMULTANEOUSLY FOR SEVEN OR MORE CHILDREN WHO ARE NOT RELATIVES OF THE OPERATOR, EXCEPT A FACILITY OPERATED UNDER SOCIAL SERVICE AUSPICES.(3) A HOME WHERE CHILD CARE IS PROVIDED AT ANY TIME TO NO LESS THAN FOUR CHILDREN AND NO MORE THAN SIX CHILDREN WHO ARE NOT RELATIVES OF THE CAREGIVER.(4) A NURSERY SCHOOL THAT IS LICENSED AND REGULATED BY THE COMMONWEALTH."FOSSIL FUEL" MEANS COAL, KEROSENE, OIL, WOOD, FUEL GASES AND OTHER PETROLEUM OR HYDROCARBON PRODUCTS WHICH EMIT CARBON MONOXIDE AS A BY-PRODUCT OF COMBUSTION."INSTALLED" MEANS A CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM THAT IS HARDWIRED INTO THE ELECTRICAL WIRING, DIRECTLY PLUGGED INTO AN ELECTRICAL OUTLET WITHOUT A SWITCH, OTHER THAN A CIRCUIT BREAKER, OR, IF THE ALARM IS BATTERY-POWERED, ATTACHED TO THE WALL OR CEILING OF A UNIT OF A CHILD CARE FACILITY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STANDARD FOR THE INSTALLATION OF CARBON MONOXIDE (CO) DETECTION AND WARNING EQUIPMENT (NFPA 720)."OPERATIONAL" MEANS WORKING AND IN SERVICE."UNIT" MEANS A ROOM OR SUITE OF TWO OR MORE ROOMS THAT IS OCCUPIED AS A RESIDENCE, INTENDED OR DESIGNED TO BE OCCUPIED AS A RESIDENCE, OR IS OCCUPIED BY A CLIENT OF A CHILD CARE FACILITY.SECTION 2. SECTION 1016(C)(1) AND (2) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 1016. RIGHT TO ENTER AND INSPECT.--* * *(C) ALL CHILD CARE CENTERS AND FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES SHALL HAVE A FIRE DETECTION DEVICE OR SYSTEM THAT IS OPERABLE AND PROPERLY MAINTAINED AT ALL TIMES IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE ACT OF 20260SB1372PN1865 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APRIL 27, 1927 (P.L.465, NO.299), REFERRED TO AS THE "FIRE AND PANIC ACT," THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1999 (P.L.491, NO.45), KNOWN AS THE "PENNSYLVANIA CONSTRUCTION CODE ACT," AND APPLICABLE REGULATIONS. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) TO VERIFY OPERABILITY, A CHILD CARE CENTER OR A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME SHALL MANUALLY TEST ALL FIRE DETECTION DEVICES OR SYSTEMS AT LEAST ONCE [EVERY THIRTY DAYS] A MONTH AND SHALL MAINTAIN A WRITTEN RECORD OF THE TESTING WITH THE FACILITY'S FIRE DRILL LOGS. OPERABILITY SHALL ALSO BE DEMONSTRATED DURING THE DEPARTMENT'S ANNUAL INSPECTION.(2) IF A FIRE DETECTION DEVICE OR SYSTEM CANNOT BE TESTED [EVERY THIRTY DAYS] ONCE A MONTH, THE CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME SHALL HAVE THE DEVICE OR SYSTEM TESTED AT LEAST ANNUALLY BY A FIRE SAFETY PROFESSIONAL AND SHALL MAINTAIN WRITTEN DOCUMENTATION OF THE TEST RESULTS WITH THE FACILITY'S FIRE DRILL LOGS. THE DOCUMENTATION SHALL BE ON THE FIRE SAFETY PROFESSIONAL'S LETTERHEAD.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF SECTION 709.5 OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260SB1372PN1865 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324